Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.910

Savings clause—2021 c 199.

Nothing in chapter 199, Laws of 2021 changes the department's responsibility to collectively bargain over mandatory subjects consistent with RCW 41.56.028(3) or limits the legislature's authority to make programmatic modifications to licensed child care and early learning programs consistent with legislative reservation of rights under RCW 41.56.028(4)(d).

[ 2021 c 199 s 601.]

NOTES:

Short title—Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 199: See notes following RCW 43.216.770.